Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 7 to 10 of this 2017 Act, the amendments to ORS  137.717 and 421.168
and section 1,  chapter 830, Oregon Laws 2015, by sections 2, 4, 5 and 6 of this 2017 Act and
the repeal of  section 16, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, by section 3 of this 2017 Act shall
be known and may be cited as the Safety and Savings Act.
FAMILY SENTENCING ALTERNATIVE PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 2.  Section 1, chapter 830, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) The Department of Corrections, in partnership with the  circuit court and county
community corrections agencies of participating counties and  the Department of Human Services,
shall establish the Family Sentencing Alternative Pilot Program.
(2) A defendant is eligible for the Family Sentencing Alternative Pilot Program if:
(a) The defendant’s presumptive sentence under the sentencing guidelines  of the Oregon Crimi-
nal Justice Commission is  a term of imprisonment in the legal and physical custody of the Depart-
ment of Corrections of at least one year;
(b) The defendant [ has not previously been convicted  of, and ] is not currently being sentenced for:
(A) A person felony as defined in the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission;
(B) A sex crime as defined in ORS [ 181.805] 163A.005; or
(C) An offense requiring a specified sentence under ORS  137.635, 137.700, 137.707, 164.061,
475.907, 475.925, 475.930 or [ 813.010] 813.011; and
(c) The defendant is  pregnant at the time of sentencing, or  is  the parent or legal guardian
of a minor child and at the time of the offense or sentencing  had physical custody of the child
[at the time of the offense ].
(3)(a) If the defendant meets the eligibility requirements described in subsection  (2) of this sec-
tion and [ receives ] is eligible for  a downward dispositional departure  under the rules of the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission, the court may order  that the defendant sign a release authorizing the
Department of Human Services to provide the community corrections  agency with written confir-
Enrolled House Bill 3078 (HB 3078-B) Page 1
mation of, and consultation concerning, any open or  current juvenile dependency proceeding or any
prior substantiated allegation of abuse or neglect involving the defendant and a minor child.
(b) The court may consider eligibility  in the Family Sentencing Alternative Pilot Program
as a mitigating factor when determining whether to sentence the defendant  to probation,
with a requirement that the defendant participate in the program as a condition of probation,
as a downward dispositional departure under the rules of the commission.
(4) After receipt of the information described in subsection  (3) of this section, the community
corrections agency, in consultation with the Department of Human Services, shall determine  if the
Family Sentencing Alternative Pilot Program is an  appropriate program for the defendant and, if the
program is  appropriate  and the defendant is sentenced to a term of probation , require partic-
ipation in the program  for the first 12 months of the probationary sentence. In addition to the con-
ditions of probation ordered under ORS 137.540, the defendant may be required to comply  with any
additional conditions related to the program, including but not limited to:
(a) Geographical restrictions, including house arrest and electronic surveillance;
(b) Participation in vocational training; and
(c) Completion of:
(A) Parenting skills classes;
(B) Drug or alcohol treatment;
(C) Mental health treatment; or
(D) Life skills classes.
(5) The  Department of Human Services and community corrections agencies shall cooperate with
the Department of Corrections in  implementing the Family Sentencing Alternative Pilot Program
described in this section.
(6) The  Department of Human Services and the Department of Corrections shall jointly submit
a report concerning the Family  Sentencing Alternative Pilot Program, which must include program
outcomes and data related to the efficacy of the program, and which may  include recommendations
for legislation in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the  Legislative
Assembly related to the judiciary no later than January 1[ , 2017] of each year .
(7) The Department of  Corrections shall establish a process for selecting counties to
participate in the Family Sentencing Alternative Pilot Program.
(8) The Department of Corrections and the Department of Human  Services may adopt
rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SHORT-TERM TRANSITIONAL LEAVE
SECTION 3.
Section 16, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, is repealed.
SECTION 4.  ORS 421.168, as amended by section  15, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, is
amended to read:
421.168. (1) The Department of Corrections shall establish a short-term  transitional leave pro-
gram. The  program shall provide inmates with an opportunity to secure appropriate transitional
support when necessary for successful reintegration into the community prior to the  inmate’s dis-
charge to post-prison supervision.
(2) The Department of Corrections shall identify each inmate  who is eligible for the short-term
transitional leave program and shall, in conjunction with  the supervisory authority for the county
to which the inmate will  be released, assist each eligible inmate in preparing a transition plan and
in identifying and applying for an employment,  educational or other transitional opportunity in the
community.
(3) If the inmate’s transition plan is approved by the department and is an essential part of  the
inmate’s successful reintegration into the community, the department may grant a transitional leave
no more than [ 30] 120 days prior to the inmate’s discharge date.
(4) An inmate is not eligible for transitional leave before having served six  months of prison
incarceration.
Enrolled House Bill 3078 (HB 3078-B) Page 2
(5) The department shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section. The rules  must
include a set of release conditions for inmates released on transitional leave status.  An inmate on
transitional leave status is subject to immediate return to prison  for any violation of the conditions
of release.
(6) The provisions of  this section do not apply to inmates whose sentences were imposed under
ORS 137.635, 137.690,  137.700 , [ or] 137.707 , 164.061, 475.907, 475.925, 475.930 or 813.011  or [ any
other] under a  provision  of law that prohibits release on any form of temporary leave from custody.
SENTENCING AND SUPERVISION FOR PROPERTY OFFENSES
SECTION 5.  ORS 137.717 is amended to read:
137.717. (1) When a court sentences a person convicted of:
(a) Aggravated theft in the first degree under ORS 164.057, burglary  in the first degree under
ORS 164.225 or aggravated identity  theft under ORS 165.803, the presumptive sentence is 24 months
of incarceration, unless the  rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission prescribe a longer
presumptive sentence, if the person has:
(A) A previous conviction for aggravated theft in the first degree under ORS  164.057, burglary
in the first  degree under ORS 164.225, robbery in the third degree under ORS 164.395, robbery in
the second degree under ORS 164.405, robbery in the first degree under ORS 164.415 or aggravated
identity theft under ORS 165.803;
(B) Two or more previous convictions for any combination of the crimes  listed in subsection (2)
of this section; or
(C) A previous conviction for a crime listed in subsection (2) of  this section, if the current crime
of conviction was  committed while the defendant was on supervision for the previous conviction or
less than three years after the date the defendant completed the period of supervision for the  pre-
vious conviction.
(b) [ Theft in the first degree under ORS 164.055, ] Unauthorized use of a vehicle under  ORS
164.135, mail theft or  receipt of stolen mail under ORS 164.162, burglary in the second degree under
ORS 164.215, criminal mischief in the first degree under ORS 164.365, computer crime  under ORS
164.377, robbery in the  third degree under ORS 164.395, forgery in the first degree under ORS
165.013, criminal possession of a forged instrument in the first degree under  ORS 165.022, fraudulent
use of a credit card under ORS 165.055 (4)(b), [ identity theft under  ORS 165.800, ] possession of a
stolen vehicle under ORS 819.300 or trafficking  in stolen vehicles under ORS 819.310, the
presumptive sentence is 18  months of incarceration, unless the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission prescribe a longer presumptive sentence, if the person has:
(A) A previous conviction for aggravated theft in the first degree under ORS 164.057,  unau-
thorized use of a vehicle under ORS  164.135, burglary in the first degree under ORS 164.225, robbery
in the third degree under ORS 164.395, robbery in  the second degree under ORS 164.405, robbery in
the first degree under ORS 164.415, possession of a stolen vehicle under ORS 819.300, trafficking  in
stolen vehicles under ORS 819.310 or aggravated identity theft under ORS 165.803;
(B) Two or more previous convictions for any combination of the crimes  listed in subsection (2)
of this section; or
(C) A previous conviction for a crime listed in subsection (2) of  this section, if the current crime
of conviction was  committed while the defendant was on supervision for the previous conviction or
less than three years after the date the defendant completed the period of supervision for the  pre-
vious conviction.
(c) Theft in the first degree under  ORS 164.055 or identity theft under ORS 165.800, the
presumptive sentence is 13 months  of incarceration, unless the rules of the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission prescribe a longer presumptive sentence, if the person has:
(A) A previous conviction for aggravated theft in the  first degree under ORS 164.057,
unauthorized use of  a vehicle under ORS 164.135, burglary in the first degree under ORS
164.225, robbery in the second degree under ORS 164.405, robbery in the first  degree under
Enrolled House Bill 3078 (HB 3078-B) Page 3
ORS 164.415, possession  of a stolen vehicle under ORS 819.300, trafficking in stolen vehicles
under ORS 819.310 or aggravated identity theft under ORS 165.803; or
(B) Four  or more previous convictions for any combination of crimes listed in subsection
(2) of this section.
(2) The crimes to which subsection (1) of this section applies are:
(a) Theft in the second degree under ORS 164.045;
(b) Theft in the first degree under ORS 164.055;
(c) Aggravated theft in the first degree under ORS 164.057;
(d) Unauthorized use of a vehicle under ORS 164.135;
(e) Mail theft or receipt of stolen mail under ORS 164.162;
(f) Burglary in the second degree under ORS 164.215;
(g) Burglary in the first degree under ORS 164.225;
(h) Criminal mischief in the second degree under ORS 164.354;
(i) Criminal mischief in the first degree under ORS 164.365;
(j) Computer crime under ORS 164.377;
(k) Forgery in the second degree under ORS 165.007;
(L) Forgery in the first degree under ORS 165.013;
(m) Criminal possession of a forged instrument in the second degree under ORS 165.017;
(n) Criminal possession of a forged instrument in the first degree under ORS 165.022;
(o) Fraudulent use of a credit card under ORS 165.055;
(p) Identity theft under ORS 165.800;
(q) Possession of a stolen vehicle under ORS 819.300;
(r) Trafficking in stolen vehicles under ORS 819.310; and
(s) Any attempt to commit a crime listed in this subsection.
(3)(a) A presumptive  sentence described in subsection (1) (a) or (b)  of this section shall be in-
creased by two months for each previous conviction the person has that:
(A) Was for any of the crimes listed in subsection (1) or (2) of this section; and
(B) Was not used as a predicate for  the presumptive sentence described in subsection (1) (a) or
(b) of this section.
(b) Previous convictions may not increase a  presumptive sentence described in subsection (1) (a)
or (b) of this section by more than 12 months under this subsection.
(4) The court may impose a sentence other than the sentence provided by subsection (1)  or (3)
of this section if the court imposes:
(a) A longer term of incarceration that is otherwise required or authorized by law; or
(b) A departure  sentence authorized by the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission
based upon findings of substantial  and compelling reasons. Unless the law or the rules of the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission allow for imposition of a longer sentence, the maximum  departure al-
lowed for a person sentenced under this subsection  is double the presumptive sentence provided in
subsection (1) or (3) of this section.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (4)(b) of this section,  the court may not sentence a person under
subsection (4) of this section to a term of incarceration that exceeds the period  of time described
in ORS 161.605.
(6) The court shall sentence a person under this section to at least  the presumptive sentence
described in subsection (1) (a) or (b)  or (3)  of this section, unless the parties stipulate otherwise or
the court finds that:
(a) The person was not on probation, parole or post-prison supervision for a crime listed  in
subsection (1) of this section at the time of the commission of the current crime of conviction;
(b) The person has  not previously received a downward departure from a presumptive sentence
for a crime listed in subsection (1) of this section;
(c) The harm or loss caused by the crime is not greater than usual for that type of crime; and
(d) In consideration of the nature of the offense and  the harm to the victim, a downward de-
parture will:
Enrolled House Bill 3078 (HB 3078-B) Page 4
(A) Increase public safety;
(B) Enhance the likelihood that the person will be rehabilitated; and
(C) Not unduly reduce the appropriate punishment.
(7) When  the court imposes a sentence of probation for a conviction for theft in the first
degree or identity theft  or under subsection (6) of this section, the supervisory authority as
defined in ORS 144.087 may require the person to receive a high level of supervision for at
least 12 months, and may  extend the period of high-level supervision for all or part of the
remaining probationary term.
[(7)(a)] (8)(a)  For a crime committed  on or after November 1, 1989, a conviction is considered
to have occurred upon the pronouncement of sentence in open court. However, when sentences are
imposed for two or more convictions arising out of the  same conduct or criminal episode, none of
the convictions is  considered to have occurred prior to any of the other convictions arising out of
the same conduct or criminal episode.
(b) For a crime committed prior to November 1, 1989, a conviction is considered to  have oc-
curred upon the  pronouncement in open court of a sentence or upon the pronouncement in open
court of the suspended imposition of a sentence.
[(8)] (9)  For purposes of this  section, previous convictions must be proven pursuant to ORS
137.079.
[(9)] (10) As used in this section:
(a) “Downward departure” means a downward dispositional departure or  a downward durational
departure under the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(b) “Previous conviction” includes:
(A) Convictions occurring before, on or after July 1, 2003; and
(B) Convictions entered in any other state or federal court for comparable offenses.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 137.717, as amended by section 7, chapter 649, Oregon Laws  2013, is amended
to read:
137.717. (1) When a court sentences a person convicted of:
(a) Aggravated theft in the first  degree under ORS 164.057, burglary in the first degree under
ORS 164.225, robbery in the third degree under ORS  164.395[, identity theft under ORS 165.800 ] or
aggravated identity theft under ORS  165.803, the presumptive sentence is 24 months of
incarceration, unless the rules of the  Oregon Criminal Justice Commission prescribe a longer
presumptive sentence, if the person has:
(A) A previous  conviction for aggravated theft in the first degree under ORS 164.057, burglary
in the first degree under ORS 164.225, robbery in the third degree under ORS 164.395,  robbery in
the second degree under ORS 164.405, robbery in the first degree under ORS 164.415 or aggravated
identity theft under ORS 165.803;
(B) Two or more previous convictions for any combination of the crimes  listed in subsection (2)
of this section; or
(C) A previous conviction for a crime listed in subsection (2) of  this section, if the current crime
of conviction was committed while the defendant was on supervision for the previous  conviction or
less than  three years after the date the defendant completed the period of supervision for the pre-
vious conviction.
(b) [ Theft in the first degree under ORS 164.055, ] Unauthorized use of a vehicle under ORS
164.135, mail theft or  receipt of stolen mail under ORS 164.162, burglary in the second degree under
ORS 164.215, criminal  mischief in the first degree under ORS 164.365, computer crime under ORS
164.377, forgery in the first degree under ORS 165.013, criminal possession of a forged instrument
in the first degree under ORS 165.022, fraudulent use of a credit  card under ORS 165.055 (4)(b),
possession of a stolen vehicle  under ORS 819.300 or trafficking in stolen vehicles under ORS 819.310,
the presumptive sentence is 18 months of incarceration, unless the rules  of the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission prescribe a longer presumptive sentence, if the person has:
(A) A  previous conviction for aggravated theft in the first degree under ORS 164.057, unau-
thorized use of a vehicle under ORS  164.135, burglary in the first degree under ORS 164.225, robbery
Enrolled House Bill 3078 (HB 3078-B) Page 5
in the third degree under ORS 164.395, robbery in  the second degree under ORS 164.405, robbery in
the first degree under ORS 164.415, possession of a stolen vehicle under ORS 819.300, trafficking  in
stolen vehicles under ORS 819.310 or aggravated identity theft under ORS 165.803;
(B) Two or more previous convictions for any combination of the crimes  listed in subsection (2)
of this section; or
(C) A previous conviction for a crime listed in subsection (2) of  this section, if the current crime
of conviction was  committed while the defendant was on supervision for the previous conviction or
less than three years after the date the defendant completed the period of supervision for the  pre-
vious conviction.
(c) Theft in the first degree under  ORS 164.055 or identity theft under ORS 165.800, the
presumptive sentence is 13 months  of incarceration, unless the rules of the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission prescribe a longer presumptive sentence, if the person has:
(A) A previous conviction for aggravated theft in the  first degree under ORS 164.057,
unauthorized use of  a vehicle under ORS 164.135, burglary in the first degree under ORS
164.225, robbery in the second degree under ORS 164.405, robbery in the first  degree under
ORS 164.415, possession  of a stolen vehicle under ORS 819.300, trafficking in stolen vehicles
under ORS 819.310 or aggravated identity theft under ORS 165.803; or
(B) Four  or more previous convictions for any combination of crimes listed in subsection
(2) of this section.
(2) The crimes to which subsection (1) of this section applies are:
(a) Theft in the second degree under ORS 164.045;
(b) Theft in the first degree under ORS 164.055;
(c) Aggravated theft in the first degree under ORS 164.057;
(d) Unauthorized use of a vehicle under ORS 164.135;
(e) Mail theft or receipt of stolen mail under ORS 164.162;
(f) Burglary in the second degree under ORS 164.215;
(g) Burglary in the first degree under ORS 164.225;
(h) Criminal mischief in the second degree under ORS 164.354;
(i) Criminal mischief in the first degree under ORS 164.365;
(j) Computer crime under ORS 164.377;
(k) Forgery in the second degree under ORS 165.007;
(L) Forgery in the first degree under ORS 165.013;
(m) Criminal possession of a forged instrument in the second degree under ORS 165.017;
(n) Criminal possession of a forged instrument in the first degree under ORS 165.022;
(o) Fraudulent use of a credit card under ORS 165.055;
(p) Identity theft under ORS 165.800;
(q) Possession of a stolen vehicle under ORS 819.300;
(r) Trafficking in stolen vehicles under ORS 819.310; and
(s) Any attempt to commit a crime listed in this subsection.
(3)(a) A presumptive sentence described in subsection (1) (a) or (b)  of this section shall  be in-
creased by two months for each previous conviction the person has that:
(A) Was for any of the crimes listed in subsection (1) or (2) of this section; and
(B) Was not used as a predicate for the  presumptive sentence described in subsection (1) (a) or
(b) of this section.
(b) Previous convictions may not increase a  presumptive sentence described in subsection (1) (a)
or (b) of this section by more than 12 months under this subsection.
(4) The court  may impose a sentence other than the sentence provided by subsection (1) or (3)
of this section if the court imposes:
(a) A longer term of incarceration that is otherwise required or authorized by law; or
(b) A departure sentence authorized by the rules of the Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission
based upon findings of substantial  and compelling reasons. Unless the law or the rules of the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission  allow for imposition of a longer sentence, the maximum departure al-
Enrolled House Bill 3078 (HB 3078-B) Page 6
lowed for a person sentenced under this subsection  is double the presumptive sentence provided in
subsection (1) or (3) of this section.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (4)(b) of this section,  the court may not sentence a person under
subsection (4) of this section to a term of incarceration that exceeds the period  of time described
in ORS 161.605.
(6) The court shall sentence a person under this section to at least  the presumptive sentence
described in subsection (1) (a) or (b)  or (3)  of this section, unless the parties stipulate otherwise or
the court finds that:
(a) The person was not on probation, parole or post-prison supervision for a crime listed  in
subsection (1) of this section at the time of the commission of the current crime of conviction;
(b) The person has  not previously received a downward departure from a presumptive sentence
for a crime listed in subsection (1) of this section;
(c) The harm or loss caused by the crime is not greater than usual for that type of crime; and
(d) In consideration of the nature of the offense and  the harm to the victim, a downward de-
parture will:
(A) Increase public safety;
(B) Enhance the likelihood that the person will be rehabilitated; and
(C) Not unduly reduce the appropriate punishment.
(7) When  the court imposes a sentence of probation for a conviction for theft in the first
degree or identity theft  or under subsection (6) of this section, the supervisory authority as
defined in ORS 144.087 may require the person to receive a high level of supervision for at
least 12 months, and may  extend the period of high-level supervision for all or part of the
remaining probationary term.
[(7)(a)] (8)(a)  For a crime committed  on or after November 1, 1989, a conviction is considered
to have occurred upon the pronouncement of sentence in open court. However, when sentences are
imposed for two or more convictions arising out of the  same conduct or criminal episode, none of
the convictions is  considered to have occurred prior to any of the other convictions arising out of
the same conduct or criminal episode.
(b) For a crime committed prior to November 1, 1989, a conviction is considered to  have oc-
curred upon the  pronouncement in open court of a sentence or upon the pronouncement in open
court of the suspended imposition of a sentence.
[(8)] (9)  For purposes of this  section, previous convictions must be proven pursuant to ORS
137.079.
[(9)] (10) As used in this section:
(a) “Downward departure” means a downward dispositional departure or  a downward durational
departure under the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(b) “Previous conviction” includes:
(A) Convictions occurring before, on or after July 1, 2003; and
(B) Convictions entered in any other state or federal court for comparable offenses.
APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 7.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,
out of the General Fund, the  amount of $7,000,000, to be deposited in the Justice Reinvest-
ment Account described in section 52, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, and  expended for the
purposes of carrying out the provisions of section 9 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 8.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of  the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of  $1,000,000, for the Crime Victims’ Services Division and services
for victims of domestic and sexual violence.
Enrolled House Bill 3078 (HB 3078-B) Page 7
OREGON CRIMINAL JUSTICE COMMISSION
SECTION 9. (1) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall establish a program to
award supplemental grant funds to counties for downward departure prison diversion  pro-
grams as part of  the Justice Reinvestment Program described in section 53, chapter 649,
Oregon Laws 2013. Notwithstanding sections 52 and 53  (1)(a), chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013,
the commission shall use the moneys described in section 7 of this 2017  Act for supplemental
grant funds for downward departure prison diversion programs in counties  selected by the
commission to receive the supplemental grant funds. The  commission shall give preference
to counties establishing downward departure prison diversion programs on  or after the ef-
fective date of this 2017 Act.
(2) The  commission shall monitor the downward departure prison diversion programs
described in subsection (1) of this section and  evaluate prison utilization by counties that
receive the supplemental grant funds. The commission shall  annually report the evaluation
findings to the Joint Interim Committee on Ways and Means.
SECTION 10. The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall study the impact  of this
2017 Act on prison utilization, recidivism and public safety and report the results of the study
to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary, in  the man-
ner provided in ORS 192.245, no later than February 1 of each year.
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
SECTION 11.
The unit captions  used in this 2017 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 12. (1) The amendments to ORS 137.717  and 421.168 by sections 4 and 5 of this
2017 Act and the repeal of section 16, chapter 649,  Oregon Laws 2013, by section 3 of this 2017
Act become operative on January 1, 2018.
(2) The amendments  to ORS 137.717 by section 6 of this 2017 Act become operative on
July 1, 2023.
SECTION 13. (1) The amendments to section 1,  chapter 830, Oregon Laws 2015, by section
2 of this 2017 Act apply to sentences imposed on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
(2) The amendments to  ORS 137.717 and 421.168 by sections 4 and 5 of this 2017 Act apply
to sentences imposed on or after January 1, 2018.
(3) The amendments to ORS 137.717 by section 6 of this 2017  Act apply to sentences im-
posed on or after July 1, 2023.
SECTION 14. (1) Section 9 of this 2017 Act is repealed on July 1, 2023.
(2) Section 10 of this 2017 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 15. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 3078 (HB 3078-B) Page 8
Passed by House July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3078 (HB 3078-B) Page 9